Hawaii statutes.
§802-1 Right to representation by public
defender or other appointed counsel. (a) Any indigent person who is:

(1) Arrested for, charged with, or convicted of an
offense or offenses punishable by confinement in jail or prison or for which
the person may be or is subject to the provisions of chapter 571;

(2) Threatened by confinement, against the indigent
person's will, in any psychiatric or other mental institution or facility;

(3) The subject of a petition for assisted community
treatment under chapter 334; or

(4) The subject of a petition for involuntary medical
treatment under chapter 353,

shall be entitled to be represented by a public
defender. If, however, conflicting interests exist, or if the public defender
for any other reason is unable to act, or if the interests of justice require,
the court may appoint other counsel.

(b) Except as provided in section 334-126(f),
the appearance of the public defender in all judicial proceedings shall be
subject to court approval.

(c) The appearance of a public defender in all
hearings before the Hawaii paroling authority or other administrative body or
agency shall be subject to the approval of the chairperson of the Hawaii
paroling authority or the administrative head of the body or agency involved.
[L 1971, c 185, pt of §1; HRS §705C-1; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1 and am L 1972,
c 44, §1(a); am L 1973, c 76, §1; am L 1976, c 92, §8; am L 1984, c 251, §2;
gen ch 1985, 1993; am L 2011, c 72, §3; am L 2015, c 231, §5]

Revision Note

In the first paragraph, (1) to (4) reformatted as paragraphs
(1) to (4) and "or" deleted in paragraphs (1) and (2) pursuant to §23G-15.

Case Notes

Failure of appointed counsel to give timely notice of appeal
did not foreclose defendant's right to appeal. 57 H. 268, 554 P.2d 236 (1976).

Defendant waived right to counsel by not reporting to public
defender during five weeks between arraignment and trial. 62 H. 298, 614 P.2d
397 (1980).

Indigent defendant charged with offense punishable by term of
imprisonment entitled at trial to be assisted by appointed counsel. 80 H. 246
(App.), 909 P.2d 574 (1995).

Defendant did not waive right to court-appointed counsel
where defendant requested substitute court-appointed counsel and was not
afforded reasonable opportunity to show good cause for a substitute
court-appointed counsel. 80 H. 262 (App.), 909 P.2d 590 (1995).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next